Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
Subarticle C. Out-of-State Trust Institution Representative Trust Office.

§ 81-27-2.201.
Representative trust office business.

An out-of-state trust institution may not act as a fiduciary, but may otherwise engage in a trust business, at a representative trust office as permitted by this subarticle.

Subject to the requirements contained in this subarticle, an out-of-state trust institution may establish and maintain representative trust offices anywhere in this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-2.202.
Registration of representative trust office.

An out-of-state trust institution may establish or acquire and maintain a representative trust office in this state. An out-of-state trust institution not maintaining a trust office in this state and desiring to establish or acquire and maintain a representative trust office shall file a notice on a form prescribed by the commissioner which shall set forth the name of the out-of-state trust institution and the location of the proposed office and satisfactory evidence that the notificant is a trust institution, furnish a copy of the resolution adopted by the board authorizing the representative trust office, and pay the filing fee, if any, prescribed by the commissioner.

The notificant may commence business at the representative trust office on the thirty-first day after the date the commissioner receives the notice, unless the commissioner specifies an earlier or later date.

The thirty-day period of review may be extended by the commissioner on a determination that the written notice raises issues that require additional information or additional time for analysis. If the period of review is extended, the out-of-state trust institution may establish the representative trust office only on prior written approval by the commissioner.

The commissioner may deny approval of the representative trust office if the commissioner finds that the notificant lacks sufficient financial resources to undertake the proposed expansion without adversely affecting its safety or soundness or that the proposed office would be contrary to the public interest. In acting on the notice, the commissioner shall consider the views of the appropriate bank supervisory agencies.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.